Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.040

Political advertising, removing or defacing.

A person who removes or defaces lawfully placed political advertising including yard signs or billboards without authorization is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. The defacement or removal of each item constitutes a separate violation.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2104. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 19; 1984 c 216 s 5. Formerly RCW 29.85.275.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Political advertising

generally: RCW 42.17A.320 through 42.17A.340.

rates for candidates: RCW 65.16.095.